Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2893.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-127A, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 6-127A. A. The Oklahoma Legislature recognizes that
public school paraprofessionals play an important role in educating
school children and in assisting teachers. The Legislature further
recognizes the increasing role of public school paraprofessionals in
the school system in light of teacher shortages. To achieve the
HB2893 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

goal of excellence for all persons who have an impact on student
learning, it is the intent of the Oklahoma Legislature that public
school paraprofessionals be afforded career opportunities and
economic incentives through a career development program.
B. The State Board of Education shall adopt a program for the
career development of public school paraprofessionals. The purpose
of the program is to provide to public school paraprofessionals a
system of career development which is based upon education and
training advancement to encourage excellence among public school
paraprofessionals. Public school paraprofessionals who hold a
bachelor's degree in education or education studies and who have not
been out of the classroom for more than ten (10) years shall be
deemed to have satisfied any rule that requires additional
professional education coursework from an institution of higher
education under the adopted program. Nothing in this section shall
be construed to require public school paraprofessionals to
participate in the career development program.
C. The board of education of a school district shall have
authority to extend an existing contract with a public school
paraprofessional that provides for the payment of compensation for
paraprofessional services rendered for the same time period during
which the paraprofessional is also assigned to the school district
for practice teaching as a student teacher.

HB2893 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

D. For the purposes of this section, a public school
paraprofessional is an employee of a school district whose position
is either instructional in nature, or who delivers other direct
services to students and/or their parents. A public school
paraprofessional serves in a position for which a teacher or another
professional has the ultimate responsibility for the design,
implementation, and evaluation of the individual educational
programs or related services and student performance.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-213 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Teachers who hold a bachelor's degree in education or education
studies shall be deemed to have satisfied any State Board of
Education rule that requires teachers to complete additional
professional education coursework from an institution of higher
education as a condition to obtain, renew, or satisfy any other
professional development requirement for an emergency certificate,
alternate placement teaching certificate, or standard certificate if
the teacher has not been out of the classroom for more than ten (10)
years.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

HB2893 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION OVERSIGHT, dated
03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.




















HB2893 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.